Maryland, session 2026, SB0243.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
15–124.
(a) (1) In this section[, “eligible] THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE
MEANINGS INDICATED.
(2) “ELIGIBLE service member” means:
[(1)] (I) An active service member; and
[(2)] (II) A veteran who has received an [honorable] OTHER THAN
DISHONORABLE discharge or a certificate of satisfactory completion of service.
(3) “ELIGIBLE SPOUSE” MEANS THE SPOUSE OF AN ELIGIBLE
SERVICE MEMBER.
(b) Subject to subsection (c) of this section, a public institution of higher education
shall grant priority registration for courses to an eligible service member OR ELIGIBLE
SPOUSE.
(c) The priority registration requirement under subsection (b) of this section:
(1) Applies only within 15 years after the eligible service member WHO
WOULD RECEIVE OR WHOSE ELIGIBLE SPOUSE WOULD RECEIVE PRIORITY
REGISTRATION was last on active duty; and
(2) Does not apply after an eligible service member’s OR ELIGIBLE
SPOUSE’S fourth academic year.
(d) Each public institution of higher education shall adopt policies necessary to
implement this section.
16–109.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 489
Each community college shall:
(1) Ensure all student advisors are trained on the unique needs and
resources available for students who are [veterans]:
(I) VETERANS; OR
(II) SPOUSES OF VETERANS;
(2) Employ at least one employee who, as a component of the employee’s
job duties and responsibilities, provides comprehensive and intensive enrollment and
advising services to current and prospective students who are [veterans]:
(I) VETERANS; OR
(II) SPOUSES OF VETERANS; and
(3) Establish a veterans resource center on campus to:
(i) Provide access to federal and State veterans AND SPOUSES OF
VETERANS resources;
(ii) Serve as a quiet place for veterans AND SPOUSES OF VETERANS
to study;
(iii) Enable veterans AND SPOUSES OF VETERANS to connect to
other veterans AND SPOUSES OF VETERANS, helping them renew the bonds of service;
and
(iv) Be the central hub for all activities on campus related to veterans
AND SPOUSES OF VETERANS.
18–401.
There is a program of senatorial scholarships in this State that are awarded under
this subtitle.
18–405.
(d) Each Senator may award not more than 10% of the funds available under this
subtitle to applicants planning to attend accredited undergraduate, graduate, or
professional institutions outside the State, provided the applicant:
(3) Is an active service member OR THE SPOUSE OF AN ACTIVE SERVICE
MEMBER who is domiciled in this State.
– 3 –

Ch. 489 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
18–406.
(g) A recipient of a senatorial scholarship who is an active service member OR
THE SPOUSE OF AN ACTIVE SERVICE MEMBER and otherwise meets the conditions of
subsection (a) or (b) of this section may be domiciled in this State rather than eligible for
in–State tuition under this article.
18–501.
(a) There is a program of Delegate Scholarships in this State that are awarded
under this subtitle.
(b) A scholarship awarded under this subtitle may be used at:
(2) An accredited undergraduate, graduate, or professional institution
outside the State, if the applicant:
(iii) Is an active service member OR THE SPOUSE OF AN ACTIVE
SERVICE MEMBER who is domiciled in this State; and
Article – Labor and Employment
3–714.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Eligible veteran” means a veteran, as defined in § 9–901 of the State
Government Article, who has received an [honorable] OTHER THAN DISHONORABLE
discharge or a certificate of satisfactory completion of service, including:
(i) a reserve component;
(ii) the Commissioned Corps of the Public Health Service; and
(iii) the Commissioned Corps of the National Oceanic and
Atmospheric Administration.
(3) “Employer” includes a county or municipal corporation.
(b) Subject to subsection (d) of this section, an employer may grant a preference
in hiring and promotion to:
(1) an eligible veteran;
(2) the spouse of an eligible veteran who has a service–connected disability;
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 489
(3) the spouse of an [eligible] active service member; or
(4) the surviving spouse of a deceased eligible veteran.
Article – Public Utilities
18–111.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “ACTIVE SERVICE MEMBER” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
9–901 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
(3) “Eligible veteran” means a veteran [of any branch of the uniformed
services] who has received an [honorable] OTHER THAN DISHONORABLE discharge or a
certificate of satisfactory completion of service, including:
(i) a reserve component;
(ii) the Commissioned Corps of the Public Health Service; and
(iii) the Commissioned Corps of the National Oceanic and
Atmospheric Administration.
[(3)] (4) “Reserve component” has the meaning stated in § 9–901 of the
State Government Article.
[(4)] (5) “Veteran” has the meaning stated in § 9–901 of the State
Government Article.
(b) The Commission may grant a preference in hiring and promotion to:
(1) an eligible veteran;
(2) the spouse of an eligible veteran who has a service–connected disability;
[or]
(3) THE SPOUSE OF AN ACTIVE SERVICE MEMBER; OR
(4) the surviving spouse of a deceased eligible veteran.
Article – State Personnel and Pensions
7–207.
– 5 –

Ch. 489 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(c) (1) (i) In this subsection the following words have the meanings
indicated.
(iii) “Eligible veteran” means a veteran who has received an
[honorable] OTHER THAN DISHONORABLE discharge or a certificate of satisfactory
completion of service, including:
1. a reserve component;
2. THE COMMISSIONED CORPS OF THE PUBLIC HEALTH
SERVICE; AND
3. THE COMMISSIONED CORPS OF THE NATIONAL
OCEANIC AND ATMOSPHERIC ADMINISTRATION.
(2) (i) An appointing authority shall apply a credit of 10 points on any
selection test for:
1. an eligible spouse;
2. an eligible veteran;
3. the spouse of an eligible veteran who has a service
connected disability; or
4. the surviving spouse of a deceased eligible veteran.
(ii) An appointing authority shall apply a credit of two additional
points on any selection test for a former prisoner of war.
(3) The following applicants are ineligible for a credit under this
subsection:
(i) a current State employee; and
(ii) an eligible veteran who is convicted of a crime after being
discharged from or completing military service.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 12, 2026.
– 6 –